District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.18

Summary suspension or restriction of license.

(a)

If the Mayor determines, after investigation, that the conduct of a licensee presents an imminent danger to the health and safety of persons in the District, the Mayor may summarily suspend or restrict, without a hearing, the license to practice an occupation or profession.

(b)

The Mayor, at the time of the summary suspension or restriction of a license, shall provide the licensee with written notice stating the action that is being taken, the basis for the action, and the right of the licensee to request a hearing.

(c)

A licensee shall have the right to request a hearing within 72 hours after service of notice of the summary suspension or restriction of license. The board shall hold a hearing within 72 hours of receipt of a timely request, and shall issue a decision within 72 hours after the hearing.

(d)

Every decision and order adverse to a licensee shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by findings of fact and conclusions of law. The findings shall be supported by, and in accordance with, reliable, probative, and substantial evidence. The relevant board shall provide a copy of the decision and order and accompanying findings of fact and conclusions of law to each party to a case or to his or her attorney of record.

(e)

Any person aggrieved by a final summary action may file an appeal in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.18.